Washington statutes.
RCW 19.27.801

Dwelling unit size technical advisory group.

(1) The state building code council shall convene a technical advisory group for the purpose of recommending amendments to the international building code that would allow for a minimum dwelling unit size that is less than the requirements for an efficiency dwelling unit in the international building code. The technical advisory group shall consider aligning the state building code sections related to interior environment with the relevant sections of the national healthy housing standard published by the national center for healthy housing. When developing the recommendations, the technical advisory group must review the differences between the state building code and the national healthy housing standard and allow experts in public health and fire safety to comment during the process.

(2) The technical advisory group shall provide its recommendations to the council in time for the council to adopt or amend rules or codes as necessary for implementation in the 2024 international building code. The council shall take action to adopt additions and amendments to rules or codes as necessary by November 1, 2026.

[ 2024 c 183 s 2.]